Illinois, session 104th, SB2106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Economic Development for a Growing Economy 5Tax Credit Act is amended by changing Section 5-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 10/5-15)7    Sec. 5-15. Tax Credit Awards. Subject to the conditions 8set forth in this Act, a Taxpayer is entitled to a Credit 9against or, as described in subsection (g) of this Section, a 10payment towards taxes imposed pursuant to subsections (a) and 11(b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act that may be 12imposed on the Taxpayer for a taxable year beginning on or 13after January 1, 1999, if the Taxpayer is awarded a Credit by 14the Department under this Act for that taxable year.15    (a) The Department shall make Credit awards under this Act 16to foster job creation and retention in Illinois.17    (b) A person that proposes a project to create new jobs in 18Illinois must enter into an Agreement with the Department for 19the Credit under this Act.20    (c) The Credit shall be claimed for the taxable years 21specified in the Agreement.22    (d) The Credit shall not exceed the Incremental Income Tax 23attributable to the project that is the subject of the   SB2106- 2 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1Agreement.2    (e) Nothing herein shall prohibit a Tax Credit Award to an 3Applicant that uses a PEO if all other award criteria are 4satisfied. 5    (f) In lieu of the Credit allowed under this Act against 6the taxes imposed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of 7Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act for any taxable year 8ending on or after December 31, 2009, for Taxpayers that 9entered into Agreements prior to January 1, 2015 and otherwise 10meet the criteria set forth in this subsection (f), the 11Taxpayer may elect to claim the Credit against its obligation 12to pay over withholding under Section 704A of the Illinois 13Income Tax Act. 14        (1) The election under this subsection (f) may be made 15    only by a Taxpayer that (i) is primarily engaged in one of 16    the following business activities: water purification and 17    treatment, motor vehicle metal stamping, automobile 18    manufacturing, automobile and light duty motor vehicle 19    manufacturing, motor vehicle manufacturing, light truck 20    and utility vehicle manufacturing, heavy duty truck 21    manufacturing, motor vehicle body manufacturing, cable 22    television infrastructure design or manufacturing, or 23    wireless telecommunication or computing terminal device 24    design or manufacturing for use on public networks and 25    (ii) meets the following criteria: 26            (A) the Taxpayer (i) had an Illinois net loss or an   SB2106- 3 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1        Illinois net loss deduction under Section 207 of the 2        Illinois Income Tax Act for the taxable year in which 3        the Credit is awarded, (ii) employed a minimum of 4        1,000 full-time employees in this State during the 5        taxable year in which the Credit is awarded, (iii) has 6        an Agreement under this Act on December 14, 2009 (the 7        effective date of Public Act 96-834), and (iv) is in 8        compliance with all provisions of that Agreement; 9            (B) the Taxpayer (i) had an Illinois net loss or an 10        Illinois net loss deduction under Section 207 of the 11        Illinois Income Tax Act for the taxable year in which 12        the Credit is awarded, (ii) employed a minimum of 13        1,000 full-time employees in this State during the 14        taxable year in which the Credit is awarded, and (iii) 15        has applied for an Agreement within 365 days after 16        December 14, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 17        96-834);18            (C) the Taxpayer (i) had an Illinois net operating 19        loss carryforward under Section 207 of the Illinois 20        Income Tax Act in a taxable year ending during 21        calendar year 2008, (ii) has applied for an Agreement 22        within 150 days after the effective date of this 23        amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, (iii) 24        creates at least 400 new jobs in Illinois, (iv) 25        retains at least 2,000 jobs in Illinois that would 26        have been at risk of relocation out of Illinois over a   SB2106- 4 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1        10-year period, and (v) makes a capital investment of 2        at least $75,000,000; 3            (D) the Taxpayer (i) had an Illinois net operating 4        loss carryforward under Section 207 of the Illinois 5        Income Tax Act in a taxable year ending during 6        calendar year 2009, (ii) has applied for an Agreement 7        within 150 days after the effective date of this 8        amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, (iii) 9        creates at least 150 new jobs, (iv) retains at least 10        1,000 jobs in Illinois that would have been at risk of 11        relocation out of Illinois over a 10-year period, and 12        (v) makes a capital investment of at least 13        $57,000,000; or 14            (E) the Taxpayer (i) employed at least 2,500 15        full-time employees in the State during the year in 16        which the Credit is awarded, (ii) commits to make at 17        least $500,000,000 in combined capital improvements 18        and project costs under the Agreement, (iii) applies 19        for an Agreement between January 1, 2011 and June 30, 20        2011, (iv) executes an Agreement for the Credit during 21        calendar year 2011, and (v) was incorporated no more 22        than 5 years before the filing of an application for an 23        Agreement. 24        (1.5) The election under this subsection (f) may also 25    be made by a Taxpayer for any Credit awarded pursuant to an 26    agreement that was executed between January 1, 2011 and   SB2106- 5 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1    June 30, 2011, if the Taxpayer (i) is primarily engaged in 2    the manufacture of inner tubes or tires, or both, from 3    natural and synthetic rubber, (ii) employs a minimum of 4    2,400 full-time employees in Illinois at the time of 5    application, (iii) creates at least 350 full-time jobs and 6    retains at least 250 full-time jobs in Illinois that would 7    have been at risk of being created or retained outside of 8    Illinois, and (iv) makes a capital investment of at least 9    $200,000,000 at the project location. 10        (1.6) The election under this subsection (f) may also 11    be made by a Taxpayer for any Credit awarded pursuant to an 12    agreement that was executed within 150 days after the 13    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 14    Assembly, if the Taxpayer (i) is primarily engaged in the 15    operation of a discount department store, (ii) maintains 16    its corporate headquarters in Illinois, (iii) employs a 17    minimum of 4,250 full-time employees at its corporate 18    headquarters in Illinois at the time of application, (iv) 19    retains at least 4,250 full-time jobs in Illinois that 20    would have been at risk of being relocated outside of 21    Illinois, (v) had a minimum of $40,000,000,000 in total 22    revenue in 2010, and (vi) makes a capital investment of at 23    least $300,000,000 at the project location. 24        (1.7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 25    election under this subsection (f) may also be made by a 26    Taxpayer for any Credit awarded pursuant to an agreement   SB2106- 6 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1    that was executed or applied for on or after July 1, 2011 2    and on or before March 31, 2012, if the Taxpayer is 3    primarily engaged in the manufacture of original and 4    aftermarket filtration parts and products for automobiles, 5    motor vehicles, light duty motor vehicles, light trucks 6    and utility vehicles, and heavy duty trucks, (ii) employs 7    a minimum of 1,000 full-time employees in Illinois at the 8    time of application, (iii) creates at least 250 full-time 9    jobs in Illinois, (iv) relocates its corporate 10    headquarters to Illinois from another state, and (v) makes 11    a capital investment of at least $4,000,000 at the project 12    location. 13        (1.8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 14    election under this subsection (f) may also be made by a 15    startup taxpayer for any Credit awarded pursuant to an 16    Agreement that was executed on or after the effective date 17    of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. Any 18    such election under this paragraph (1.8) shall be 19    effective unless and until such startup taxpayer has any 20    Illinois income tax liability. This election under this 21    paragraph (1.8) shall automatically terminate when the 22    startup taxpayer has any Illinois income tax liability at 23    the end of any taxable year during the term of the 24    Agreement. Thereafter, the startup taxpayer may receive a 25    Credit, taking into account any benefits previously 26    enjoyed or received by way of the election under this   SB2106- 7 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1    paragraph (1.8), so long as the startup taxpayer remains 2    in compliance with the terms and conditions of the 3    Agreement. 4        (1.9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 5    election under this subsection (f) may also be made by an 6    applicant qualified under paragraph (1.7) of subsection 7    (b) of Section 5-20 for any Credit awarded pursuant to an 8    Agreement that was executed on or after the effective date 9    of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. Any 10    such election under this paragraph (1.9) shall be 11    effective unless and until such taxpayer has any Illinois 12    income tax liability. This election under this paragraph 13    (1.9) shall automatically terminate when the taxpayer has 14    any Illinois income tax liability at the end of any 15    taxable year during the term of the Agreement. Thereafter, 16    the startup taxpayer may receive a Credit, taking into 17    account any benefits previously enjoyed or received by way 18    of the election under this paragraph (1.9), so long as the 19    startup taxpayer remains in compliance with the terms and 20    conditions of the Agreement. 21        (1.10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 22    election under this subsection (f) may also be made by a 23    taxpayer that: (i) is primarily engaged in the business of 24    pharmacy, health, and wellness; (ii) maintains its 25    corporate headquarters in Illinois; (iii) maintains a 26    minimum of 500 retail locations throughout the State; (iv)   SB2106- 8 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1    employs at least 2,500 employees in full-time jobs or 2    full-time equivalent jobs, some of whom would be at risk 3    of termination if not for the use of the Credit as provided 4    in this paragraph; (v) had an Illinois net loss or an 5    Illinois net loss deduction under Section 207 of the 6    Illinois Income Tax Act for the taxable year in which the 7    Credit is awarded or within the 2 years immediately 8    preceding the taxable year in which the Credit is awarded; 9    and (vi) and makes an application for an Agreement within 10    120 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act 11    of the 104th General Assembly. 12        (2) An election under this subsection shall allow the 13    credit to be taken against payments otherwise due under 14    Section 704A of the Illinois Income Tax Act during the 15    first calendar quarter beginning after the end of the 16    taxable quarter in which the credit is awarded under this 17    Act. 18        (3) The election shall be made in the form and manner 19    required by the Illinois Department of Revenue and, once 20    made, shall be irrevocable. 21        (4) If a Taxpayer who meets the requirements of 22    subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection (f) 23    elects to claim the Credit against its withholdings as 24    provided in this subsection (f), then, on and after the 25    date of the election, the terms of the Agreement between 26    the Taxpayer and the Department may not be further amended   SB2106- 9 -LRB104 10480 HLH 20555 b1    during the term of the Agreement. 2    (g) A pass-through entity that has been awarded a credit 3under this Act, its shareholders, or its partners may treat 4some or all of the credit awarded pursuant to this Act as a tax 5payment for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act. The term 6"tax payment" means a payment as described in Article 6 or 7Article 8 of the Illinois Income Tax Act or a composite payment 8made by a pass-through entity on behalf of any of its 9shareholders or partners to satisfy such shareholders' or 10partners' taxes imposed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of 11Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. In no event shall 12the amount of the award credited pursuant to this Act exceed 13the Illinois income tax liability of the pass-through entity 14or its shareholders or partners for the taxable year. 15(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 16103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)